Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1460
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Law Enforcement Attraction and Retention Act:

(1) Council means the Nebraska Police Standards Advisory Council; and

(2) Law enforcement officer has the same meaning as in section 81-1401.

Laws 2022, LB1241, § 7.
June 30, 2028